Hawaii statutes.
§311-2 State commissioners. (a)
Hawaii's representatives to the Education Commission of the States, hereinafter
called the "commission", shall consist of seven members. The
governor; two members of the legislature selected by its respective houses and
serving in such manner as the legislature may determine; and the head of a
state agency or institution, designated by the governor, having one or more
programs of public education, shall be ex officio members of the commission.
The other three members shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the
governor.

(b) The selection and terms of the members of
the commission shall be governed by the applicable provisions of section 26-34.

(c) Members of the commission shall serve
without pay but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses while
attending meetings and while in the discharge of duties and responsibilities.
[L 1966, c 32, §3; HRS §311-2; am L 1996, c 115, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next